Utah statutes.
59-7-313.   Valuation of property for inclusion in property factor.
(1)  Property owned by the taxpayer is valued at its original cost.
(2)  Property rented by the taxpayer is valued at eight times the net annual
rental rate.
(3)  Net annual rental rate is the annual rental rate paid by the taxpayer
less any annual rental rate received by the taxpayer from subrentals.
(4)  Property owned or rented by an airline is valued as provided in this
section, subject to the calculation required by Subsection 59-7-312(2).
